Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,246
Trailers; brake requirements; safety chains; when required.

(1) All commercial trailers with a carrying capacity of more than ten thousand pounds and semitrailers shall be equipped on each wheel with brakes that can be operated from the driving position of the towing vehicle.

(2) Cabin trailers and recreational trailers having a gross loaded weight of three thousand pounds or more but less than six thousand five hundred pounds shall be equipped with brakes on at least two wheels, and such trailers with a gross loaded weight of six thousand five hundred pounds or more shall be equipped with brakes on each wheel. The brakes shall be operable from the driving position of the towing vehicle. Such trailers shall also be equipped with a breakaway, surge, or impulse switch on the trailer so that the trailer brakes are activated if the trailer becomes disengaged from the towing vehicle.

(3) Cabin trailers, recreational trailers, and utility trailers, when being towed upon a highway, shall be securely connected to the towing vehicle by means of two safety chains or safety cables in addition to the hitch or other primary connecting device. Such safety chains or safety cables shall be so attached and shall be of sufficient breaking load strength so as to prevent any portion of such trailer drawbar from touching the roadway if the hitch or other primary connecting device becomes disengaged from the towing vehicle.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) Recreational trailer means a vehicular unit without motive power primarily designed for transporting a motorboat as defined in section 37-1204 or a vessel as defined in section 37-1203; and

(b) Utility trailer has the same meaning as in section 60-358.

Laws 1959, c. 165, § 2, p. 604;

Laws 1972, LB 1164, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 368, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-773.01;

Laws 1989, LB 695, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,134;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 342;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 30;

Laws 1995, LB 6, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 244.